Utah statutes.
41-22-10.3.   Operation of vehicles on highways -- Limits.

A person may not operate an off-highway vehicle upon any street or highway, not designated as open to off-highway vehicle use, except:

(1)  when crossing a street or highway and the operator comes to a complete stop before crossing, proceeds only after yielding the right of way to oncoming traffic, and crosses at a right angle;

(2)  when loading or unloading an off-highway vehicle from a vehicle or trailer, which shall be done with due regard for safety, and at the nearest practical point of operation;

(3)  when an emergency exists, during any period of time and at those locations when the operation of conventional motor vehicles is impractical or when the operation is directed by a peace officer or other public authority; or

(4)  when operating a street-legal all-terrain vehicle on a highway in accordance with Section 41-6a-1509.

